Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1242
Notice; opportunity to be heard; joinder.

(a) Before a child custody determination is made under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, notice and an opportunity to be heard in accordance with the standards of section 43-1233 shall be given to all persons entitled to notice under the law of this state as in child custody proceedings between residents of this state, any parent whose parental rights have not been previously terminated, and any person having physical custody of the child.

(b) The act does not govern the enforceability of a child custody determination made without notice or an opportunity to be heard.

(c) The obligation to join a party and the right to intervene as a party in a child custody proceeding under the act are governed by the law of this state as in child custody proceedings between residents of this state.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 17.